Alaska statutes. Title 43. Revenue and Taxation.
Article 7. Miscellaneous Provisions.

Sec. 43.82.600.
Governing law.

If a provision of this chapter conflicts with another provision of state or municipal law, the provision of this chapter governs.

History.

(§ 3 ch 104 SLA 1998)

Sec. 43.82.610.
Regulations.

The commissioner of revenue, the commissioner of natural resources, and the commissioner of labor and workforce development may adopt regulations to carry out their respective duties under this chapter.

History.

(§ 3 ch 104 SLA 1998)

Revisor’s notes. —

In 1999, in this section, “commissioner of labor” was changed to “commissioner of labor and workforce development” in accordance with § 90, ch. 58, SLA 1999.

Sec. 43.82.620.
Procedures for collection of amounts due; security.

The commissioner may adopt procedures for the collection of amounts due the state under a contract developed under AS

43.82.020

, including the collection of interest and penalties.

The commissioner may require a party to a contract developed under AS

43.82.020

to provide security sufficient to guarantee amounts due under the contract.

History.

(§ 3 ch 104 SLA 1998)

Sec. 43.82.630.
Reports and audits.

The commissioner may require periodic reports from and may at reasonable intervals conduct audits and inspect the books of a party that has entered into a contract developed under AS

43.82.020

to ensure compliance with the provisions of this chapter and the regulations adopted under this chapter and of the terms of the contract.

History.

(§ 3 ch 104 SLA 1998)

Sec. 43.82.640.
Annual report of the commissioner of labor and workforce development.

On an annual basis, the commissioner of labor and workforce development shall prepare and present to the legislature a comprehensive report on each party to a contract with the state developed under AS

43.82.020

, and its contractors, regarding the state residency of the employees working in this state on the approved qualified project that is subject to the contract. The commissioner of labor and workforce development shall use state data bases, including data from the quarterly reports by a party to the contract developed under AS

43.82.020

and its contractors for unemployment insurance purposes, to determine state residency of employees regarding compliance with AS

43.82.230

.

History.

(§ 3 ch 104 SLA 1998)

Revisor’s notes. —

In 1999, in this section, “commissioner of labor” was changed to “commissioner of labor and workforce development” in accordance with § 90, ch. 58, SLA 1999.